Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-413
University of Nebraska Facilities Program; created; use.

The University of Nebraska Facilities Program is created. All funds appropriated to the program by the Legislature shall be used exclusively for deferred maintenance, repair, renovation, and facility replacement construction projects authorized pursuant to section 85-414.

Laws 1998, LB 1100, § 2.